ko: 직조 스타일: 브리사; 크로셰; 쿠엔카; 다이아몬드; 헤링본; 라마; 야노(리소); 러스틱; 티어드롭; 테히도 피노; 토피도; 트윌; 기타
ro-RO: Stil de țesătură: Brisa; Croșetat; Cuenca; Diamant; În formă de spic; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustic; Lacrimă; Tejido Fino; Torpilă; Twill; Altele
en: Weave style: Brisa; Crochet; Cuenca; Diamond; Herringbone; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustic; Teardrop; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Twill; Other
lt-LT: Audimo stilius: Brisa; Nėrimas vąšeliu; Kuenka; Deimantinis; Eglutės rašto; Lama; Liano (Liso); Kaimiškas; Lašo formos; Tejido Fino; Torpedos formos; Ruoželinis; Kita
vi: Kiểu dệt: Brisa; Đan móc; Cuenca; Hình thoi; Xương cá; Llama; Llano (Liso); Mộc mạc; Hình giọt nước; Tejido Fino; Hình ngư lôi; Dệt chéo; Khác
tr: Dokuma stili: Brisa; Tığ işi; Cuenca; Elmas; Balıksırtı; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustik; Damla; Tejido Fino; Torpido; Dimi; Diğer
fi: Kudontatyyli: Brisa; Virkkaus; Cuenca; Timantti; Kalanruoto; Laama; Llano (Liso); Rustiikkinen; Kyynel; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Toimikas; Muu
zh-TW: 編織樣式: Brisa; 鉤織; Cuenca; 菱形格紋; 人字紋; Llama; 亞諾 (平織); 粗織; 淚珠紋; 細織 (Tejido Fino); 魚雷紋; 斜紋; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo de tecelagem: Brisa; Croché; Cuenca; Diamante; Espinha; Llama; Llano (liso); Rústico; Lágrima; Tejido fino; Torpedo; Sarja; Outro
el: Στυλ ύφανσης: Brisa; Κροσέ; Cuenca; Ρομβοειδής; Ψαροκόκαλο; Λάμα; Llano (Liso); Ρουστίκ; Δάκρυ; Tejido Fino; Τορπίλη; Τουίλ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Štýl tkania: Brisa; Háčkované; Cuenca; Diamantový; Rybia kosť; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustikálny; Slzovitý; Tejido Fino; Torpédo; Keper; Iné
es: Estilo de tejido: Brisa; Crochet; Cuenca; Diamante; Espiga; Llama; Llano (liso); Rústico; Lágrima; Tejido fino; Torpedo; Sarga; Otro
zh-CN: 编织样式: Brisa; 钩针编织; Cuenca; 菱形; 人字纹; Llama; Llano (Liso); 粗布; 泪滴; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; 斜纹; 其他
sl-SI: Stil tkanja: Brisa; Kvačkano; Cuenca; Diamant; Ribja kost; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustikalno; Solza; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Keper; Drugo
cs: Styl tkaní: Brisa; Háčkování; Cuenca; Kosočtverec; Rybí kost; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustikální; Slza; Tejido Fino; Torpédo; Kepr; Jiný
nl: Weefstijl: Brisa; Gehaakt; Cuenca; Ruit; Visgraat; Lama; Llano (Liso); Rustiek; Druppel; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Twill; Overig
hu: Szövet stílusa: Brisa; Horgolt; Cuenca; Gyémánt; Halszálkás; Láma; Llano (Liso); Rusztikus; Csepp; Tejido Fino; Torpedó; Sávoly; Egyéb
bg-BG: Стил на тъкане: Бриса; Плетка на една кука; Куенка; Диамант; Рибена кост; Лама; Ляно (Лисо); Рустик; Сълза; Техидо Фино; Торпедо; Кепър; Други
da: Vævestil: Brisa; Hæklet; Cuenca; Diamant; Sildeben; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustik; Dråbe; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Twill; Andet
ru: Стиль плетения: Бриза; Кроше; Куэнка; Ромб; Елочка; Лама; Льяно (гладкое); Рустик; Капля; Техидо фино; Торпеда; Твил; Другое
fr: Style de tissage: Brisa; Crochet; Cuenca; Losange; Chevrons; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustique; Goutte d’eau; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Sergé; Autre
hr-HR: Stil tkanja: Brisa; Kukičano; Cuenca; Dijamantni uzorak; Uzorak riblje kosti; Ljama; Llano (Liso); Rustikalno; Oblik suze; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Keper; Ostalo
de: Webart: Brisa; Häkeln; Cuenca; Raute; Fischgrät; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustikal; Tropfen; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Twill; Andere
it: Stile di tessitura: Brisa; Uncinetto; Cuenca; A diamante; A spina di pesce; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustico; A goccia; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Twill; Altro
nb: Type veving: Brisa; Heklet; Cuenca; Diamant; Fiskebein; Lama; Llano (Liso); Rustikk; Dråpe; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Twill; Annet
pl: Styl splotu: Brisa; Szydełko; Cuenca; W karo; Jodełka; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustykalny; Łezka; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Splot skośny; Inne
ja: 織りスタイル: ブリーザ; クロシェ; クエンカ; ダイヤモンド; ヘリンボーン; リャマ; リャノ (リソ); ラスティック; ティアドロップ; テヒード・フィノ; トルペード; ツイル; その他
sv: Typ av vävning: Brisa; Virkad; Cuenca; Diamant; Fiskben; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rustik; Droppe; Tejido Fino; Torped; Kypert; Övrigt
pt-BR: Estilo de trama: Brisa; Crochê; Cuenca; Diamante; Espinha de peixe; Llama; Llano (Liso); Rústico; Lágrima; Tejido Fino; Torpedo; Sarja; Outro
th: สไตล์การทอ: Brisa; โครเชต์; Cuenca; ลายข้าวหลามตัด; ลายก้างปลา; Llama; Llano (Liso); รัสติค; ลายหยดน้ำ; Tejido Fino; ทอร์ปิโด; ลายทแยง; อื่นๆ